Kentucky statutes. TITLE V Military Affairs
Kentucky Medal for Freedom

40.353.
Kentucky Medal for Freedom — Eligibility — Administrative regulations — Funds to defray costs.

The Kentucky Medal for Freedom is hereby created to be awarded by the Kentucky Department of Veterans’ Affairs to an individual who has been killed in action on or after January 1, 1991, while:

Engaged in an action against an enemy of the United States;

Engaged in military operations involving conflict with an opposing foreign force;

Serving with friendly foreign forces engaged in an armed conflict against an opposing armed force in which the United States is not a belligerent party; or

Serving in a combat zone as designated by presidential order.

Individuals eligible to receive the Kentucky Medal for Freedom include:

Members of the Kentucky National Guard or a Reserve Component stationed in Kentucky;

Members of a state National Guard or a Reserve Component who named Kentucky as a home of record;

Members of the regular United States Armed Forces who named Kentucky as a home of record; and

Members of the regular United States Armed Forces, a state National Guard, or a Reserve component who were buried in Kentucky on or after July 15, 2008, and have a surviving spouse, parent, or next available family member who is a Kentucky resident.

The department shall enter the name of a recipient of the Kentucky Medal for Freedom on the Kentucky Medal for Freedom roll.

The department shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to carry out the provisions of this section.

The department may receive funds from the veterans’ program trust fund to defray the cost of the Kentucky Medal for Freedom.

History.

Enact. Acts 2008, ch. 26, § 1, effective July 15, 2008; 2013, ch. 114, § 2, effective June 25, 2013.